Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ACTIVE SHOOTER RESPONSE EQUIPMENT PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Pilot program establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must establish and administer an active shooter response equipment pilot program to award grants to eligible law enforcement agencies under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility; grant awards; maximums. new text end new text begin Each local law enforcement agency that does not have, or that has an insufficient quantity of, equipment needed to respond to active shooter incidents at the public schools located in the agency's jurisdiction may apply for a grant. Grant funds must be used to purchase equipment needed to respond to active shooter incidents within schools. In awarding grants, the commissioner must give priority to agencies that do not have active shooter response equipment. A grant under the pilot program must not exceed a total of $....... per agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin An applicant shall submit a completed form prepared and provided by the commissioner of public safety. In addition to any other information required by the commissioner, each application must identify the schools in the agency's jurisdiction by the grades enrolled at the school, the number of students attending the school, and the specific challenges the school's location and design present in responding to an active shooter incident. An application must also include a plan to store the active shooter response equipment in a location that maximizes rapid access to the equipment during an active shooter incident at public schools within the applicant's jurisdiction. The proposed equipment storage plan of an applicant must assess the feasibility of storing active shooter response equipment in secure locations within public schools. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin ACTIVE SHOOTER RESPONSE EQUIPMENT PILOT PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to establish and operate the active shooter response equipment pilot program. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end